Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 3

Tennessee Control Share Acquisition Act

48-103-301. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Control Share Acquisition Act.”

Acts 1988, ch. 500, § 9; T.C.A., § 48-35-301.

Cross-References. Merger and share exchange, title 48, ch. 21.

Securities law, title 48, ch. 1.

Tennessee Authorized Corporation Protection Act, title 48, ch. 103, part 4.

Tennessee Business Combination Act, title 48, ch. 103, part 2.

Tennessee Greenmail Act, title 48, ch. 103, part 5.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 7 Tenn. Juris., Corporations, § 42.

48-103-302. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Associate,” when used to indicate a relationship with any person means:

A person that directly or indirectly controls, or is controlled by, or is under common control with, the person specified or who is or intends to act jointly or in concert with such specified person;

Any corporation or organization of which such person is an officer, director or partner or which corporation or organization is, directly or indirectly, the beneficial owner of ten percent (10%) or more of any class of equity securities of such person;

Any trust or other estate in which such person has a beneficial interest or as to which such person serves as trustee or in a similar fiduciary capacity; and

Any parent, child, sibling, in-law (mother, father, sons and daughters), of such person, or any relative of such person who has the same residence as such person;

“Control” means the possession, direct or indirect, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of a person whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract or otherwise;

“Control share acquisition” means the acquisition, directly or indirectly, by any person of ownership of, or the power to direct the exercise of voting power with respect to, issued and outstanding control shares. All shares acquired within ninety (90) days and all shares acquired pursuant to a plan to make a control share acquisition shall be deemed to have been acquired in the same acquisition for purposes of this subdivision (3);

“Control share acquisition” does not include:

Shares acquired for the benefit of others by a person acting in the ordinary course of business, in good faith and not for the purpose of circumventing this part, to the extent that such person may not exercise or direct the exercise of the voting power of such shares except upon the instruction of others;

Shares or shares issuable upon conversion, exchange or exercise of securities convertible into or exchangeable or exercisable for shares acquired:

Before the date on which the issuing corporation becomes subject to this part;

Pursuant to a contract existing before the date on which the issuing corporation becomes subject to this part;

Pursuant to the laws of descent and distribution;

Pursuant to the satisfaction of a pledge or other security interest created in good faith and not for the purpose of circumventing this section;

Pursuant to a merger or share exchange effected in compliance with chapter 21 of this title if the issuing public corporation is a party to the agreement of merger or consolidation;

provided, that “control shares” includes such shares only to the extent to which their acquisition causes the acquiring person to exceed any threshold of voting power set forth above for which approval has not been obtained previously pursuant to § 48-103-307;

Shares with respect to which voting rights are held pursuant to a revocable proxy conferring the right to vote on any matter, including a vote of shareholders under § 48-103-307, or pursuant to written consent; or

Any acquisition described in subdivision (3)(C);

Unless the acquisition, when added to the shares previously held by the acquiring person would entitle the acquiring person to exercise or direct the exercise of voting power in a range in excess of a range of voting power previously authorized pursuant to § 48-103-307 or subdivision (3)(B)(ii) the acquisition of shares, or of securities convertible into shares, does not constitute a control share acquisition if the acquisition is made:

By or from a person whose voting rights previously were authorized by the shareholders of the corporation in compliance with this part;

By or from a person whose acquisition of shares of the corporation would have constituted a control share acquisition but for the application of any of the exceptions set forth in subdivision (3)(B)(ii); or

By a person who acquires any of the shares that were previously transferred pursuant to subdivision (3)(B)(ii);

“Control shares” means shares which, but for this part, would have voting power with respect to shares of a corporation that, when added to all other shares of the corporation owned by a person or with respect to which that person may exercise or direct the exercise of voting power, except by virtue of a revocable proxy or written consent, would entitle that person, immediately upon acquisition of the shares, to exercise or direct the exercise of voting power of the corporation in the election of directors within any of the following ranges of voting power:

One fifth (1/5) or more but less than one third (1/3) of all voting power;

One third (1/3) or more but less than a majority of all voting power; or

A majority or more of all voting power;

“Corporation” means a corporation organized under the laws of Tennessee which has become subject to this part pursuant to § 48-103-310 and which has:

One hundred (100) or more shareholders;

Its principal place of business, its principal office, or substantial assets within Tennessee; and

Either:

More than ten percent (10%) of its shareholders resident in Tennessee;

More than ten percent (10%) of its shares owned by shareholders resident in Tennessee; or

Ten thousand (10,000) or more shareholders resident in Tennessee;

“Interested shares” means the shares of a corporation which are owned, or with respect to which an irrevocable proxy is held, by:

An acquiring person;

Any officer of the corporation; or

Any employee of the corporation who is also a director of the corporation; and

“Person” means any individual, corporation, partnership, unincorporated association or other entity and any “associate” (as defined in subdivision (1)) of such individual or entity.

Acts 1988, ch. 500, § 17; T.C.A., § 48-35-302.

48-103-303. Voting rights generally.

Control shares of a corporation that are acquired in a control share acquisition shall have only such voting rights as shall be conferred pursuant to § 48-103-307.

Acts 1988, ch. 500, § 10; T.C.A., § 48-35-303.

48-103-304. Control share acquisition statement.

Any person who has made a control share acquisition or who holds of record ten percent (10%) or more of the outstanding shares of the corporation and who announces a good faith intention to make a control share acquisition may deliver to the corporation personally or by registered mail at its principal place of business and at its registered office in this state, a control share acquisition statement which shall contain the following:

The identity of the acquiring person and any associate of the acquiring person;

A statement that it is being made and delivered pursuant to the Tennessee Control Share Acquisition Act;

If the acquiring person is not a resident of this state, an agreement that the acquiring person may be served with process in this state in any proceeding arising out of or relating to the control share acquisition and irrevocably appointing the secretary of state as its agent to accept service of process in any such proceeding, specifying the address to which a copy of such process shall be mailed by the secretary of state;

The number and class or series of shares of the corporation owned, directly or indirectly, by the acquiring person and each associate of the acquiring person prior to the control share acquisition;

The number and class or series of shares acquired or proposed to be acquired pursuant to the control share acquisition and the range of voting power within which the control share acquisition is or, if consummated, would be, as such ranges are defined in § 48-103-302(4); and

A description of the terms and conditions of the proposed or completed control share acquisition including, but not limited to, the prices paid by the acquiring person in a control share acquisition, the dates upon which the shares were acquired, and if the control share acquisition has not taken place, a statement by the acquiring person with respect to the acquiring person's financial capacity to consummate the proposed control share acquisition together with a concise description of the material facts upon which the statement is based.

Acts 1988, ch. 500, § 11; T.C.A., § 48-35-304.

Cross-References. Applicability to authorized corporations, § 48-103-404.

Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

48-103-305. Meeting to consider control share voting rights.

If the acquiring person so demands contemporaneously with the delivery of a control share acquisition statement, the board of directors of the corporation, within twenty (20) days of the receipt of the demand, shall call a special meeting of shareholders for the purpose of considering the voting rights to be accorded the control shares acquired or to be acquired in the control share acquisition. The demand will not be effective unless accompanied by an undertaking to pay the corporation's reasonable expenses in connection with noticing and holding the special meeting, which expenses shall not include any expenses of the corporation in opposing a resolution to accord voting rights to the acquiring person.

Promptly after the board has called the special meeting, the corporation shall give written notice of the special meeting to shareholders. Such notice shall be given not less than twenty (20) days before the date of the special meeting.

Unless the acquiring person and the corporation shall agree in writing to a later date, the special meeting shall be held not more than fifty (50) days after the receipt by the corporation of the demand. If the acquiring person so requests in the demand, the special meeting will be held no sooner than thirty (30) days after receipt by the corporation of the demand.

If no demand respecting a special meeting of the corporation's shareholders is made in accordance with subsection (a), consideration of the voting rights to be accorded the shares acquired or to be acquired in the control share acquisition shall be presented at the next annual or special meeting of the corporation's shareholders as to which notice has not been given prior to the receipt by the corporation of the control share acquisition statement.

Acts 1988, ch. 500, § 12; T.C.A., § 48-35-305.

48-103-306. Notice of meeting.

The notice to the corporation's shareholders of any annual or special meeting at which the voting rights to be accorded shares acquired or to be acquired in a control share acquisition shall be directed to all shareholders of record of the corporation as of the record date set for such meeting, whether or not such shareholders shall be entitled to vote at such meeting, and shall include or be accompanied by a copy of the acquiring person's control share acquisition statement received by the corporation pursuant to this part.

Acts 1988, ch. 500, § 13; T.C.A., § 48-35-306.

48-103-307. Shareholder approval of voting rights.

Control shares acquired in a control share acquisition shall have the same voting rights as all other shares of the same class or series only if approved by resolution of the corporation's shareholders at an annual or special meeting convened pursuant to § 48-103-306. Such resolution must be approved at such meeting by the holders of a majority of all of the shares entitled to vote generally with respect to the election of directors except interested shares, which shall not be entitled to vote with respect to such resolution. If no such resolution is approved, such shares shall regain their voting rights upon transfer to another person unless such transfer constitutes a control share acquisition by the aquistor, in which case the voting rights of such shares shall be subject to the provisions hereof. Sections 48-17-104 and 48-17-208 shall not apply to the shareholder approval contemplated by this part.

Acts 1988, ch. 500, § 14; T.C.A., § 48-35-307.

48-103-308. Redemption of control shares.

Notwithstanding §§ 48-16-101 and 48-16-102, but subject to §§ 48-16-302 and 48-16-401, charter or bylaw provisions effective prior to the occurrence of a control share acquisition may authorize the redemption, at the option of the corporation, of all but not less than all control shares acquired in a control share acquisition, at any time during the period ending sixty (60) days after the last acquisition of control shares by an acquiring person, from the acquiring person for the fair value of such shares if:

No control acquisition statement has been filed; or

A control acquisition statement has been filed and the shares are not accorded voting rights by the shareholders pursuant to § 48-103-307.

For purposes of this section, fair value shall be determined as of the effective date of the vote of the shareholders denying voting rights to the acquiring person if a control acquisition statement is filed or, if no control acquisition statement is filed, as of the date of the last acquisition of control shares by the acquiring person in a control share acquisition. Such value shall be determined without regard to the effect of the denial of voting rights hereunder.

Acts 1988, ch. 500, § 15; T.C.A., § 48-35-308.

48-103-309. Appraisal of shares of dissenting shareholders.

A charter or bylaw provision effective prior to the occurrence of a control share acquisition may provide that, in the event control shares acquired in a control share acquisition are accorded voting rights and the acquiring person has acquired control shares that confer upon such person a majority or more of all voting power entitled to vote generally with respect to the election of directors, all shareholders of record of the corporation, other than the acquiring person, who have not voted in favor of granting such voting rights to the acquiring person shall be entitled to an appraisal of the fair value of their shares in accordance with chapter 23 of this title.

For purposes of this section, fair value shall be determined as of the date of the approval of voting rights by the shareholders and in accordance with chapter 23 of this title which shall apply as nearly as practicable except that:

Dissenting shareholders shall be provided with copies of all valuations, projections and estimates of the value of the corporation in the possession, custody, or control of the acquiring person or such acquiring person's associates or advisors; and

Fair value includes consideration of the valuations, future events or transactions bearing upon the corporation's value to the acquiring shareholder as described in any valuations, projections or estimates made by or on behalf of the acquiring person or the acquiring person's associates.

The corporation, not less than twenty (20) days prior to the meeting convened pursuant to § 48-103-306, shall notify each of its shareholders that appraisal rights may be available for any or all shares of the corporation, and shall include in such notice a copy of this section and an accurate summary of chapter 13 of this title.

Each shareholder electing to demand the appraisal of the shareholder's shares shall deliver to the corporation, before the taking of the vote described in § 48-103-307, a written demand for appraisal of the shareholder's shares. A proxy or vote against the voting rights of an acquiring person shall not constitute such a demand. A shareholder electing to take such action must do so by a separate written demand as herein provided.

Within ten (10) days after any vote in favor of a resolution granting voting rights to an acquiring person, the corporation shall notify each shareholder who has complied with this subsection (d) that the resolution has been adopted.

The corporation shall deliver to the acquiring person, within five (5) days of the taking of the vote under § 48-103-307, a statement setting forth the aggregate number of shares not voted in favor of the resolution and with respect to which demands for appraisal have been received and the aggregate number of holders of such shares.

Acts 1988, ch. 500, § 16; T.C.A., § 48-35-309.

48-103-310. Applicability.

This part shall be applicable to any corporation as defined in § 48-103-302 whose charter or bylaws contain an express declaration that control share acquisitions respecting the shares of the corporation are governed by and subject to this part.

Sections 48-103-308 and 48-103-309, or either of them, shall apply to such corporation only if the charter or bylaw declaration under subsection (a) explicitly so provides.

Acts 1988, ch. 500, § 18; T.C.A., § 48-35-310.

Law Reviews.

It's My Stock and I'll Vote If I Want To: Conflicted Voting by Shareholders in (Hostile) M & A Deals, 47 U. Mem. L. Rev. 181 (2016).

48-103-311. Actions for violations of part.

Actions may be brought in any court of competent jurisdiction for violations of this part, in the same manner as any other civil action, by the corporation, the interested shareholder, by the other shareholders of issued and outstanding voting stock of the corporation, or by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1988, ch. 500, § 19; T.C.A., § 48-35-311.

Cross-References. Applicability to authorized corporations, § 48-103-404.

48-103-312. Severability — Construction with other laws.

If any clause, sentence, subparagraph, paragraph, subsection, section, article or other portion of this part, or the application thereof to any person or circumstances, shall be held invalid, such holding shall not affect, impair or invalidate the remainder of this part or the application of such portion held invalid to any other person or circumstances, but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, subparagraph, paragraph, subsection, section, article or other portion thereof directly involved in such holding or to the person or circumstances therein involved.

If any provision of this part is inconsistent with, in conflict with, or contrary to any other provision of Tennessee law, such provision of this part shall prevail over such other provision, and such other provision shall be deemed to be amended, superseded or repealed to the extent of such inconsistency or conflict.

Acts 1988, ch. 500, § 20; T.C.A., § 48-35-312.